Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB349.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 532.031 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "gender identity or expression" means having or being
perceived as having a gender-related self-identity or expression, whether or not
associated with an individual's assigned sex at birth.
(2) A person is guilty of a hate crime if the person maliciously and intentionally
commits an offense under:
(a) KRS Chapter 507;
(b) KRS Chapter 508, except for a violation of KRS 508.025, 508.030, 508.032,
508.060, 508.070, 508.152, or 508.160;
(c) KRS Chapter 509;
(d) KRS 512.020 or 512.030; or
(e) KRS 513.020, 513.030, or 513.040;
against an individual based in whole or in substantial part on an actual or
perceived characteristic of another individual or group of individuals as set forth
in subsection (3) of this section, regardless of the existence of any other
motivating factors.
(3) The actual or perceived characteristics of another individual referenced under
subsection (2) of this section include any or all of the following:
(a) Race or color;
(b) Religion;
(c) Sex;
(d) Sexual orientation;
(e) Gender identity or expression;
(f) Physical or mental disability;
Page 1 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
(g) Age;
(h) Ethnicity;
(i) National origin; and
(j) Association or affiliation with an individual or group of individuals based
on a characteristic described in paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a person who violates
subsection (2) of this section is guilty of a Class D felony and subject to a fine of
not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment for not more than
three (3) years, or both.
(5) If any of the following conditions apply, a person who violates subsection (2) of
this section is guilty of a Class D felony punishable by imprisonment for not more
than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000),
or both:
(a) The violation results in bodily injury;
(b) A victim of the violation is less than eighteen (18) years of age, and the
offender is at least nineteen (19) years of age;
(c) The person commits the violation in concert with one (1) or more
individuals;
(d) The person is in possession of a firearm during the commission of the
violation; or
(e) The person has one (1) or more prior convictions for violating subsection
(2) of this section.
(6) (a) In lieu of or in addition to the penalties described in subsection (4) of this
section, the court may, if the victim consents, impose an alternative sentence
or reduce any penalty imposed under subsection (4) of this section by not
more than twenty percent (20%), or both.
(b) In determining the suitability of an alternative sentence or reduced penalty,
Page 2 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
the court shall consider the following:
1. The criminal history of the defendant;
2. The impact of the offense on the victim and the community;
3. The availability of the alternative sentence; and
4. The nature of the violation.
(c) An alternative sentence may, if the entity chosen for community service is
amenable, include an order requiring the defendant to complete a period of
community service intended to enhance the defendant's understanding of
the impact of the offense upon the victim and the community.
Section 2. KRS 15.334 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall approve mandatory training subjects
to be taught to all students attending a law enforcement basic training course that
include but are not limited to:
(a) Abuse, neglect, and exploitation of the elderly and other crimes against the
elderly, including the use of multidisciplinary teams in the investigation and
prosecution of crimes against the elderly;
(b) The dynamics of domestic violence, pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined
in KRS 620.020, child physical and sexual abuse, and rape; child
development; the effects of abuse and crime on adult and child victims,
including the impact of abuse and violence on child development; legal
remedies for protection; lethality and risk issues; profiles of offenders and
offender treatment; model protocols for addressing domestic violence, rape,
pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020, and child abuse;
available community resources and victim services; and reporting
requirements. This training shall be developed in consultation with legal,
victim services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with
expertise in domestic violence, child abuse, and rape. Training in recognizing
Page 3 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with
organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of
pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services;
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency
virus syndrome;
(d) Identification and investigation of, responding to, and reporting hate crimes
and[bias-related crime,] victimization[,] or intimidation that is a result of or
reasonably related to race, color, ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity or expression as defined in Section 1 of this Act, physical or
mental disability, age, or national origin;
(e) The characteristics and dynamics of human trafficking, state and federal laws
relating to human trafficking, the investigation of cases involving human
trafficking, including but not limited to screening for human trafficking, and
resources for assistance to the victims of human trafficking;
(f) Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall require that a law enforcement
basic training course include at least eight (8) hours of training relevant to
sexual assault; and
(g) Education on female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125, including
the risk factors associated with female genital mutilation, the criminal
penalties for committing female genital mutilation, and the psychological and
health effects on a victim of female genital mutilation.
(2) [(a) ]The council shall develop and approve mandatory in-service training courses
to be presented to all certified peace officers. The council may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A setting forth the
deadlines by which all certified peace officers shall attend the mandatory in-service
training courses.
Page 4 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
(3) (a)[(b)] [Beginning January 1, 2017, ]The council shall establish a forty (40)
hour sexual assault investigation training course[. After January 1, 2019], and
agencies shall maintain officers on staff who have completed the forty (40)
hour sexual assault investigation training course in accordance with the
following:
1. Agencies with more than ten (10) but fewer than twenty-one (21) full-
time officers shall maintain one (1) officer who has completed the forty
(40) hour sexual assault investigation training course;
2. Agencies with twenty-one (21) or more but fewer than fifty-one (51)
full-time officers shall maintain at least two (2) officers who have
completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training
course; and
3. Agencies with fifty-one (51) or more full-time officers shall maintain at
least four (4) officers who have completed the sexual assault
investigation course.
(b)[(c)] An agency shall not make an officer directly responsible for the
investigation or processing of sexual assault offenses unless that officer has
completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course.
(c)[(d)] The council may, upon application by any agency, grant an exemption
from the training requirements set forth in paragraph (a)[(b)] of this
subsection if that agency, by limitations arising from its scope of authority,
does not conduct sexual assault investigations.
(d)[(e)] Any agency failing to comply with paragraph (a) or (b)[ or (c)] of this
subsection shall, from the date the noncompliance commences, have one (1)
year to reestablish the minimum number of trained officers required.
(4) (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, the council shall establish a hate crime
identification, investigation, response, and reporting training course. After
Page 5 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
January 1, 2028, agencies shall require all officers on staff to complete
training on hate crime identification, investigation, response, and reporting
once every two (2) years.
(b) An agency shall not make an officer responsible for hate crime
identification, investigation, response, or reporting unless that officer has
completed the training course.
(c) The council may, upon application by any agency, grant an exception from
the training requirements set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection if
that agency, by limitations arising from its scope of authority, does not
conduct hate crime investigations.
(d) Any agency failing to comply with paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection
shall, from the date the noncompliance commences, have one (1) year to
reestablish the minimum number of trained officers required.
(5)[(3)] The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall provide training on the subjects of
domestic violence, hate crimes, and abuse and may do so utilizing currently
available technology. All certified peace officers shall be required to complete this
training at least once every two (2) years.
(6)[(4)] The council shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to establish mandatory basic training and in-service training
courses.
Section 3. KRS 17.1523 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The uniform offense report shall contain provisions for obtaining information as to
whether [or not ]specific crimes appear from their facts and circumstances to be
caused as a result of or reasonably related to race, color, ethnicity, religion, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity or expression as defined in Section 1 of this
Act, physical or mental disability, age, or national origin.
(2) All law enforcement officers, when completing a uniform offense report, shall note
Page 6 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
on the report[thereon] whether [or not ]the offense appears to be caused as a result
of or reasonably related to race, color, ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity or expression as defined in Section 1 of this Act, physical or
mental disability, age, or national origin or attempts to victimize or intimidate
another due to any of the foregoing causes.
(3) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall, annually, as a part of the crime reports
report on crimes which appear to have been caused by the factors cited in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Regardless of the existence or outcome of any criminal prosecution, a person who
suffers bodily injury or property damage as a result of a violation of Section 1 of this
Act may bring a civil cause of action against the person who commits the offense to
secure an injunction, actual damages, including damages for emotional distress, or
other appropriate relief. A plaintiff who prevails in a civil action brought under this
section may recover:
(1) Damages in the amount of three (3) times the actual damages described in
this section;
(2) Punitive damages;
(3) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs; and
(4) Any other penalty established by law.
Section 5. KRS 15.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each unit of government that meets the following requirements shall be eligible to
share in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program
fund:
(a) Employs one (1) or more police officers;
(b) Pays every police officer at least the minimum federal wage;
Page 7 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
(c) Requires all police officers to have, at a minimum, a high school degree, or its
equivalent as determined by the council, except that each police officer
employed prior to the date on which the officer's police department was
included as a participant under KRS 15.410 to 15.510 shall be deemed to have
met the requirements of this subsection;
(d) 1. Requires all police officers to successfully complete a basic training
course of nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours' duration within one (1)
year of the date of employment at a school certified or recognized by the
council, which may provide a different number of hours of instruction as
established in this paragraph, except that each police officer employed
prior to the date on which the officer's police department was included
as a participant under KRS 15.410 to 15.510 shall be deemed to have
met the requirements of this subsection.
2. As the exclusive method by which the number of hours required for
basic training courses shall be modified from that which is specifically
established by this paragraph, the council may, by the promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13A, explicitly set the exact number of hours for basic training
at a number different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours based
upon a training curriculum approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Council as determined by a validated job task analysis.
3. If the council sets an exact number of hours different from nine hundred
twenty-eight (928) in an administrative regulation as provided by this
paragraph, it shall not further change the number of hours required for
basic training without promulgating administrative regulations in
accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.
4. Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to prevent the council,
Page 8 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
pursuant to its authority under KRS 15.330, from approving training
schools with a curriculum requiring attendance of a number of hours
that exceeds nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours or the number of
hours established in an administrative regulation as provided by
subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph. However, the training
programs and schools for the basic training of law enforcement
personnel conducted by the department pursuant to KRS 15A.070 shall
not contain a curriculum that requires attendance of a number of hours
for basic training that is different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928)
hours or the number of hours established in an administrative regulation
promulgated by the council pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter
13A as provided by subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph.
5. KRS 15.400 and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph
to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:
a. Years of service credit as a law enforcement officer with previous
service in another state; and
b. Basic training completed in another state.
6. KRS 15.400 and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph
to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:
a. Completion of eight hundred forty-eight (848) hours of training at
a school established pursuant to KRS 15A.070;
b. A minimum of fifteen (15) years of experience as a certified law
enforcement instructor at a school established pursuant to KRS
Page 9 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
15A.070;
c. Completion of an average of forty (40) hours of Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council approved in-service training annually from
January 1, 1997, through January 1, 2020;
d. Three (3) years of active, full-time service as a:
i. City, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated
local, or unified local government police officer;
ii. Sheriff's deputy, excluding special deputies appointed under
KRS 70.045;
iii. Department of Kentucky State Police officer; or
iv. Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources game
warden exercising peace officer powers under KRS 150.090;
and
e. Completion of the:
i. Twenty-four (24) hour legal update Penal Code course;
ii. Sixteen (16) hour legal update constitutional procedure
course; and
iii. Forty (40) hour basic officer skills course within one (1) year
prior to applying for certification;
(e) Requires all police officers to successfully complete each calendar year an in-
service training course, appropriate to the officer's rank and responsibility and
the size and location of the officer's police department, of forty (40) hours'
duration, at a school certified or recognized by the council which may include
a four (4) hour course which meets the requirements of paragraph (j) of this
subsection. This in-service training requirement shall be waived for the period
of time that a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States
Armed Forces. This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the
Page 10 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
date of September 11, 2001;
(f) Complies with all provisions of law applicable to police officers or police
departments, including transmission of data to the centralized criminal history
record information system as required by KRS 17.150 and transmission of
reports as required by KRS 15.391;
(g) Complies with all rules and regulations, appropriate to the size and location of
the police department issued by the cabinet to facilitate the administration of
the fund and further the purposes of KRS 15.410 to 15.510;
(h) Possesses a written policy and procedures manual related to domestic violence
for law enforcement agencies that has been approved by the cabinet. The
policy shall comply with the provisions of KRS 403.715 to 403.785. The
policy shall include a purpose statement; definitions; supervisory
responsibilities; procedures for twenty-four (24) hour access to protective
orders; procedures for enforcement of court orders or relief when protective
orders are violated; procedures for timely and contemporaneous reporting of
adult abuse and domestic violence to the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, Department for Community Based Services; victim rights,
assistance, and service responsibilities; and duties related to timely
completion of records;
(i) Possesses[ by January 1, 2023,] a written policy and procedures manual
related to sexual assault examinations that meets the standards provided by,
and has been approved by, the cabinet, and which includes:
1. A requirement that evidence collected as a result of an examination
performed under KRS 216B.400 be taken into custody within five (5)
days of notice from the collecting facility that the evidence is available
for retrieval;
2. A requirement that evidence received from a collecting facility relating
Page 11 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
to an incident which occurred outside the jurisdiction of the police
department be transmitted to a police department with jurisdiction
within ten (10) days of its receipt by the police department;
3. A requirement that all evidence retrieved from a collecting facility under
this paragraph be transmitted to the Department of Kentucky State
Police forensic laboratory within thirty (30) days of its receipt by the
police department;
4. A requirement that a suspect standard, if available, be transmitted to the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory with the
evidence received from a collecting facility;
5. A process for notifying the victim from whom the evidence was
collected of the progress of the testing, whether the testing resulted in a
match to other DNA samples, and if the evidence is to be destroyed. The
policy may include provisions for delaying notice until a suspect is
apprehended or the office of the Commonwealth's attorney consents to
the notification, but shall not automatically require the disclosure of the
identity of any person to whom the evidence matched; and
6. A requirement that DNA samples collected as a result of an examination
performed under KRS 216B.400 that are voluntarily submitted solely for
elimination purposes shall not be checked against any DNA index,
retained, or included in any DNA index;[ and]
(j) Requires all police officers to successfully complete by December 31, 2022,
and every two (2) years thereafter, a training course certified by the council of
not less than four (4) hours in emergency vehicle operation; and
(k) Possesses a written policy and procedures manual related to hate crime
identification, investigation, response, and reporting for law enforcement
agencies that has been approved by the cabinet. The policy shall include a
Page 12 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1062
purpose statement; definitions; supervisory responsibilities; procedures for
timely reporting of hate crimes to the Federal Bureau of Investigation;
victim rights, assistance, and service responsibilities; and duties related to
timely completion of records.
(2) A unit of government which meets the criteria of this section shall be eligible to
continue sharing in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation
Program fund only if the police department of the unit of government remains in
compliance with the requirements of this section.
(3) Deputies employed by a sheriff's office shall be eligible to participate in the
distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund
regardless of participation by the sheriff.
(4) Failure to meet a deadline established in a policy adopted pursuant to subsection
(1)(i) of this section for the retrieval or submission of evidence shall not be a basis
for a dismissal of a criminal action or a bar to the admissibility of the evidence in a
criminal action.
Section 6. The following KRS section is repealed:
49.320 Victim of hate crime deemed victim of criminally injurious conduct.
Page 13 of 13
XXXX 2/3/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed